Utah statutes.
31A-30-114.   Disclosure.

(1)  A covered carrier shall make the information described in Subsection (2) available:

(a)  to:

(i)  a small employer; or

(ii)  an individual; and

(b) (i)  at the time of solicitation; or

(ii)  upon the request of:

(A)  a small employer; or

(B)  an individual;

(c)  as part of the covered carrier's solicitation and sales materials.

(2)  The following information is required to be disclosed or made available under Subsection (1):

(a)  the provisions of the coverage concerning the covered carrier's right to change premium rates; and

(b)  the factors that may effect changes in premium rates;

(c)  the provisions of the coverage relating to renewability of coverage; and

(d)  the provisions of the coverage relating to any preexisting condition exclusion.



Enacted by Chapter 308, 2002 General Session

